Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.390

Adequate space and facilities required for livestock inspectors and veterinarians to function.

Public livestock market facilities shall include space and facilities necessary for livestock inspectors and veterinarians to properly carry out their duties, as provided by law and rules adopted under law, in a safe and expeditious manner.

[ 2003 c 326 s 85; 1959 c 107 s 39.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.